Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201677-1707
Collection of taxes; receipts; accountability
of county treasurer.

The county treasurer shall be held strictly
accountable for all receipts, including receipts found missing at regular
settlement, and also for all detached receipts. All
irregularities in the issuance of receipts that render them worthless must
be shown on the face of the receipt.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 149, p. 442;

R.S.1913, § 6478;

C.S.1922, § 6001;

C.S.1929, § 77-1906;

Laws 1943, c. 174, § 1(2), p. 608;

R.S.1943, § 77-1707;

Laws 2003, LB 292, § 14;

Laws 2012, LB851, § 4.